Utah statutes.
76-10-509.5.   Penalties for providing certain weapons to a minor.

(1)  Any person who provides a handgun to a minor when the possession of the handgun by the minor is a violation of Section 76-10-509.4 is guilty of:

(a)  a class B misdemeanor upon the first offense; and

(b)  a class A misdemeanor for each subsequent offense.

(2)  Any person who transfers in violation of applicable state or federal law a sawed-off rifle, sawed-off shotgun, or fully automatic weapon to a minor is guilty of a third degree felony.

